test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-64puhksama_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - `puhksama: # Verb (64) `puhksama 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     puhksama+V+Inf/mA: puhksama
     puhksama+V+Inf: puhastaq
     puhksama+V+Act+PrfPrc: puhasnuq
     puhksama+V+Pss+PrfPrc: [puhast, puhastu]

     puhksama+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: puhksa
     puhksama+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [puhksat, puhksadõq]
     puhksama+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: puhksas
     puhksama+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: puhksamiq
     puhksama+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: puhksatiq
     puhksama+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: puhksasõq
     puhksama+V+Act+Ind+ConNegII: puhksa
     puhksama+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: puhksi
     puhksama+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [puhksit, puhksiq, puhksidõq]
     puhksama+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: puhasʼ
     puhksama+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: puhksimiq
     puhksama+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: puhksitiq
     puhksama+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [puhksiq, puhksivaq]

     puhksama+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg1: puhasta
     puhksama+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg3: puhastas

     puhksama+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: puhksav

     puhksama+V+Jus: puhaskuq
